Tennessee statutes. Title 16 Courts
Part 6

Service of Process [Repealed]

16-15-601 — 16-15-605. [Repealed.]

Compiler's Notes. Former part 6, §§ 16-15-601 — 16-15-605 (Acts 1959, ch. 109, § 18; 1972, ch. 564, § 1; 1979, ch. 419, §§ 1, 2; 1980, ch. 799, § 1; T.C.A., §§ 16-1117, 16-1126, 16-1127, 16-1129 — 16-1131), concerning service of process, was repealed by Acts 1993, ch. 241, § 17.